Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-213
Oath of office; counties, when deemed organized; judicial district, how determined.

The oath of office may be administered to the several county officers of such new county by any person authorized by law to administer oaths. As soon as the county officers are duly qualified, the county shall be regarded as legally organized, and for judicial purposes shall be deemed and taken as belonging to the district in which the new county, or the greater part thereof, is embraced, and terms of the district court shall be held at such place in the new county as the county board thereof shall designate, until the county seat thereof shall be permanently located.

Laws 1879, § 14, p. 357;

R.S.1913, § 924;

C.S.1922, § 830;

C.S.1929, § 25-213;

R.S.1943, § 22-213.